Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1104
Order; payment of benefits; alternate payee.

(1) A qualified domestic relations order may provide for the payment of benefits to an alternate payee beginning on or after the member's earliest retirement date but before the member terminates employment. Payment of the benefit to the alternate payee pursuant to a qualified domestic relations order shall commence either on the member's retirement date or on the first day of the month immediately following the month in which the alternate payee notifies the statewide public retirement system of the election to begin payment, but not prior to the member's earliest retirement date.

(2) If payment begins after the member's earliest retirement date but prior to the member's retirement date, the alternate payee is only entitled to the actuarial equivalent of the alternate payee's share of the member's benefit payable on the member's earliest retirement date or the alternate payee's election date, whichever is later.

Laws 1996, LB 1273, § 4.